Washington statutes.
RCW 3.62.010

Suspension of fine or penalty.

The district court may at the time of sentencing or at any time thereafter suspend a portion or all of a fine or penalty.

[ 1984 c 258 s 305; 1961 c 299 s 105.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.